Washington statutes.
RCW 36.75.260

Annual report to secretary of transportation.

Each county legislative authority shall on or before May 31st of each year submit such records and reports to the secretary of transportation, on forms furnished by the department, as are necessary to enable the secretary to compile an annual report on county highway operations.

[ 1999 c 204 s 2; 1984 c 7 s 31; 1977 c 75 s 31; 1963 c 4 s 36.75.260. Prior: 1943 c 82 s 8; 1937 c 187 s 58; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6450-58.]